dropLetter.twol
Alphabet
A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{D%}
%{C%}
%{K%}
%{SPC%}
%(n%):n
%{DOUB%}
%-
%(%{I%}%):%{I%}
%(%{A%}%):%{A%}
%(s%):s
%(y%):y
%{Ph1%}
%{Ph2%}
%{Ph3%}
%{Ph4%}
%{Ph5%}
%{Ph6%}
%{Ph7%}
%{Ph8%}
%{Ph9%}
%{rT%}
%{rÇ%}
%{rK%}
%{rP%}
%{rEİ%}
%{rEÜ%}
%{rAU%}
%{rAI%}
%'
;

Sets

Vow = A E I İ O Ö U Ü
		a e ı i o ö u ü %{Ph2%} %{Ph5%} %{A%} %{I%} %{rEİ%} %{rEÜ%} %{rAU%} %{rAI%} ;

Cons = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z
		b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z %{DOUB%} %{D%} %{C%}
		%{Ph1%} %{K%} %{Ph3%} %{Ph4%} %{Ph6%} %{Ph7%} %{Ph8%} %{Ph9%} %(y%) %{rT%} %{rÇ%} %{rK%} %{rP%};

beforeN = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z
			b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z %(n%) %{DOUB%} ;

Rules

"Drop I"
%(%{I%}%):0 <=> [Vow: ] [%': ]* [%-: ]+ _;

"Drop I2"
%(%{I%}%):0 <=> \[k: ] [%-: ] _ [t: ] [%-: ] ;

"Drop A"
%(%{A%}%):0 <=> [Vow: ] [%': ]* [%-: ]+ _;

"Drop s"
%(s%):0 <=> [Cons: ] [%-: ]+ _;

"Drop y1"
%(y%):0 <=> [Cons: ]+ [%-: ]+ _;

"Drop y2"
%(y%):0 <=> [%(n%): ] [%-: ]+ _ \[l: ];
